Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1934
State Fire Marshal; inspection; fee;
delegation of authority; department; investigations authorized; delegation
of authority.

(1)
The department may request the State Fire Marshal to inspect any residential
child-caring agency for fire safety under section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal
shall assess a fee for such inspection under section 81-505.01 payable by
the applicant or licensee. The State Fire Marshal may delegate the authority
to make such inspections to qualified local fire prevention personnel under
section 81-502.

(2) The department
may investigate any residential child-caring agency to determine if the place
or places to be covered by the license meet standards of sanitation and physical
well-being set by the department for the care and protection of the children
who may be placed with the residential child-caring agency. The department
may delegate this authority to qualified local environmental health personnel.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 11.
May 26, 2013